North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 8. Health Insurance Program for Children.

§ 108A-70.18.
Definitions.

As used in this Part, unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the term:

“Comprehensive health coverage” means creditable health coverage as defined under Title XXI.

“Family income” has the same meaning as used in determining eligibility for the Medical Assistance Program.

“FPL” or “federal poverty level” means the federal poverty guidelines established by the United States Department of Health and Human Services, as revised each April 1.

“Medical Assistance Program” means the State Medical Assistance Program established under Part 6 of Article 2 of Chapter 108A of the General Statutes.

(4a)

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-96, s. 1, effective June 19, 2015.

“Program” means The Health Insurance Program for Children established in this Part.

“State Plan” means the State Child Health Plan for the State Children’s Health Insurance Program established under Title XXI.

“Title XXI” means Title XXI of the Social Security Act, as added by Pub. L. 105-33, 111 Stat. 552, codified in scattered sections of 42 U.S.C.

“Uninsured” means the applicant for Program benefits is not covered under any private or employer-sponsored comprehensive health insurance plan on the date of enrollment.

History.

1998-1, s. 1; 1998-166, s. 6; 2000-67, s. 11.8(a); 2000-140, s. 90(d); 2001-424, s. 21.22(b); 2008-107, s. 10.13(d); 2015-96, s. 1.

§ 108A-70.19.
Short title; purpose; no entitlement.

This Part may be cited as “The Health Insurance Program for Children Act of 1998.” The purpose of this Part is to provide comprehensive health insurance coverage to uninsured low-income children who are residents of this State. Coverage shall be provided from federal funds received, State funds appropriated, and other nonappropriated funds made available for this purpose. Nothing in this Part shall be construed as obligating the General Assembly to appropriate funds for the Program or as entitling any person to coverage under the Program.

History.

1998-1, s. 1.

§ 108A-70.20.
Program established.

The Health Insurance Program for Children is established. The Program shall be known as North Carolina Health Choice for Children, and it shall be administered by the Department of Health and Human Services in accordance with this Part and as required under Title XXI and related federal rules and regulations. Administration of claims processing shall be as described in 42 C.F.R. 447.45(d)(1).

History.

1998-1, s. 1; 2008-107, s. 10.13(e); 2015-96, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2008-107, s. 10.13(e), effective July 1, 2008, inserted “known as
North Carolina Health Choice for Children, and it shall be” near the middle of the paragraph.

Session Laws 2015-96, s. 2, effective June 19, 2015, rewrote the last sentence in the section, which formerly read: “Administration of Program benefits and claims processing shall be as provided under Part 5 of Article 3 of Chapter 135 of the General Statutes.”

§ 108A-70.20A.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2015-96, s. 3, effective June 19, 2015.

History.

2008-107, s. 10.13(c); 2011-85, s. 2.8; repealed by 2015-96, s. 3, effective June 19, 2015.

§ 108A-70.21.
Program eligibility; benefits; enrollment fee and other cost-sharing; coverage from private plans.

Eligibility. — The Department may enroll eligible children based on availability of funds. Following are eligibility and other requirements for participation in the Program:

Children must:

Be between the ages of 6 through 18;

Be ineligible for Medicaid, Medicare, or other federal government-sponsored health insurance;

Be uninsured;

Be in a family whose family income is above one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) and less than or equal to two hundred eleven percent (211%) of the federal poverty level;

Be a resident of this State and eligible under federal law; and

Have paid the Program enrollment fee required under this Part.

Proof of family income and residency and declaration of uninsured status shall be provided by the applicant at the time of application for Program coverage. The family member who is legally responsible for the children enrolled in the Program has a duty to report any change in the enrollee’s status within 60 days of the change of status.

If a responsible parent is under a court order to provide or maintain health insurance for a child and has failed to comply with the court order, then the child is deemed uninsured for purposes of determining eligibility for Program benefits if at the time of application the custodial parent shows proof of agreement to notify and cooperate with the child support enforcement agency in enforcing the order.If health insurance other than under the Program is provided to the child after enrollment and prior to the expiration of the eligibility period for which the child is enrolled in the Program, then the child is deemed to be insured and ineligible for continued coverage under the Program. The custodial parent has a duty to notify the Department within 10 days of receipt of the other health insurance, and the Department, upon receipt of notice, shall disenroll the child from the Program. As used in this paragraph, the term “responsible parent” means a person who is under a court order to pay child support.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, enrollment shall be continuous for one year. At the end of each year, applicants may reapply for Program benefits.

Benefits. — All health benefits changes of the Program shall meet the coverage requirements set forth in this subsection. Except as otherwise provided for eligibility, fees, deductibles, copayments, and other cost sharing charges, health benefits coverage provided to children eligible under the Program shall be equivalent to coverage provided for dependents under [the] North Carolina Medicaid Program except for the following:

No services for long-term care.

No nonemergency medical transportation.

No EPSDT.

Dental services shall be provided on a restricted basis in accordance with criteria adopted by the Department to implement this subsection.In addition to the benefits provided under the North Carolina Medicaid Program, the following services and supplies are covered under the Health Insurance Program for Children established under this Part:

(1),

(1a) Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 10.41(b), effective July 1, 2011.

(2)

Vision: Scheduled routine eye examinations once every 12 months, eyeglass lenses or contact lenses once every 12 months, routine replacement of eyeglass frames once every 24 months, and optical supplies and solutions when needed. NCHC recipients must obtain optical services, supplies, and solutions from NCHC enrolled, licensed or certified ophthalmologists, optometrists, or opticians. In accordance with

G.S. 148-134

, NCHC providers must order complete eyeglasses, eyeglass lenses, and ophthalmic frames through Nash Optical Plant. Eyeglass lenses are limited to NCHC-approved single vision, bifocal, trifocal, or other complex lenses necessary for a Plan enrollee’s visual welfare. Coverage for oversized lenses and frames, designer frames, photosensitive lenses, tinted contact lenses, blended lenses, progressive multifocal lenses, coated lenses, and laminated lenses is limited to the coverage for single vision, bifocal, trifocal, or other complex lenses provided by this subsection. Eyeglass frames are limited to NCHC-approved frames made of zylonite, metal, or a combination of zylonite and metal. All visual aids covered by this subsection require prior approval. Requests for medically necessary complete eyeglasses, eyeglass lenses, and ophthalmic frames outside of the NCHC-approved selection require prior approval. Requests for medically necessary fabrication of complete eyeglasses or eyeglass lenses outside of Nash Optical Plant require prior approval. Upon prior approval refractions may be covered more often than once every 12 months.

(3)

Under the North Carolina Health Choice Program for Children, the co-payment for nonemergency visits to the emergency room for children whose family income is less than or equal to one hundred fifty-nine percent (159%) of the federal poverty level is ten dollars ($10.00). The co-payment for children whose family income is above one hundred fifty-nine percent (159%) and less than or equal to two hundred eleven percent (211%) of the federal poverty level is twenty-five dollars ($25.00).

(4)

Over the counter medications: Selected over the counter medications provided the medication is covered under the State Medical Assistance Plan. Coverage shall be subject to the same policies and approvals as required under the Medicaid program.

Routine diagnostic examinations and tests: annual routine diagnostic examinations and tests, including x-rays, blood and blood pressure checks, urine tests, tuberculosis tests, and general health check-ups that are medically necessary for the maintenance and improvement of individual health are covered.No benefits are to be provided for services and materials under this subsection that do not meet the standards accepted by the American Dental Association.The Department shall provide services to children enrolled in the NC Health Choice Program through Community Care of North Carolina (CCNC) and shall pay Community Care of North Carolina providers the per member, per month fees as allowed under Medicaid.

(b1)

Payments. —

Prescription drug providers shall accept as payment in full, for outpatient prescriptions filled, amounts allowable for prescription drugs under Medicaid. For all other providers, services provided to children enrolled in the Program shall be provided at rates equivalent to one hundred percent (100%) of Medicaid rates, less any co-payments assessed to enrollees under this Part.

Annual Enrollment Fee. — There shall be no enrollment fee for Program coverage for enrollees whose family income is less than or equal to one hundred fifty-nine percent (159%) of the federal poverty level. The enrollment fee for Program coverage for enrollees whose family income is above one hundred fifty-nine percent (159%) and less than or equal to two hundred eleven percent (211%) of the federal poverty level shall be fifty dollars ($50.00) per year per child with a maximum annual enrollment fee of one hundred dollars ($100.00) for two or more children. The enrollment fee shall be collected by the county department of social services and retained to cover the cost of determining eligibility for services under the Program. County departments of social services shall establish procedures for the collection of enrollment fees.

Cost-Sharing. — There shall be no deductibles, copayments, or other cost-sharing charges for families covered under the Program whose family income is less than or equal to one hundred fifty-nine percent (159%) of the federal poverty level, except that fees for outpatient prescription drugs are applicable and shall be one dollar ($1.00) for each outpatient generic prescription drug, for each outpatient brand-name prescription drug for which there is no generic substitution available, and for each covered over-the-counter medication. The fee for each outpatient brand-name prescription drug for which there is a generic substitution available is three dollars ($3.00). Families covered under the Program whose family income is above one hundred fifty-nine percent (159%) of the federal poverty level shall be responsible for copayments to providers as follows:

Five dollars ($5.00) per child for each visit to a provider, except that there shall be no copayment required for well-baby, well-child, or age-appropriate immunization services;

Five dollars ($5.00) per child for each outpatient hospital visit;

A one dollar ($1.00) fee for each outpatient generic prescription drug, for each outpatient brand-name prescription drug for which there is no generic substitution available, and for each covered over-the-counter medication. The fee for each outpatient brand-name prescription drug for which there is a generic substitution available is ten dollars ($10.00).

Twenty dollars ($20.00) for each emergency room visit unless:

The child is admitted to the hospital, or

No other reasonable care was available as determined by the Department.Copayments required under this subsection for prescription drugs apply only to prescription drugs prescribed on an outpatient basis.

Cost-Sharing Limitations. — The Department shall establish maximum annual cost-sharing limits per individual or family, provided that the total annual aggregate cost-sharing, including enrollment fees, with respect to all children in a family receiving benefits under this section shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the family’s income for the year involved.

Coverage From Private Plans. — The Department shall, from funds available for the Program, pay the cost for dependent coverage provided under a private insurance plan for persons eligible for coverage under the Program if all of the following conditions are met:

The person eligible for Program coverage requests to obtain dependent coverage from a private insurer in lieu of coverage under the Program and shows proof that coverage under the private plan selected meets the requirements of this subsection;

The dependent coverage under the private plan is actuarially equivalent to the coverage provided under the Program and the private plan does not engage in the exclusive enrollment of children with favorable health care risks;

The cost of dependent coverage under the private plan is the same as or less than the cost of coverage under the Program; and

The total annual aggregate cost-sharing, including fees, paid by the enrollee under the private plan for all dependents covered by the plan, do not exceed five percent (5%) of the enrollee’s family income for the year involved.The Department may reimburse an enrollee for private coverage under this subsection upon a showing of proof that the dependent coverage is in effect for the period for which the enrollee is eligible for the Program.

, (h) Repealed by Session Laws 2015-241, s. 12H.14(a), effective September 18, 2015.

(i)

Benefits provided to an enrollee in the Program may be subject to lifetime maximum limits set forth in Medicaid and NC Health Choice medical coverage policies adopted pursuant to

G.S. 108A-54.2

.

History.

1998-1, s. 1; 1999-237, s. 11.9; 2002-126, s. 10.20(a); 2003-284, s. 10.29(a); 2005-276, ss. 10.22(b), 10.22(c), 10.22(d); 2007-323, s. 28.22A(o); 2007-345, s. 12; 2008-107, ss. 10.12(b), (c), 10.13(f), (k); 2008-118, s. 1.6(b), (c); 2009-16, s. 4(d); 2009-451, s. 10.35(a); 2011-145, s. 10.41(b); 2013-360, s. 12H.10(g); 2015-96, s. 4; 2015-241, ss. 12H.2(f), 12H.14(a), (b), 12H.25(b), 12H.26(b); 2015-245, s. 22; 2017-102, s. 16.

§ 108A-70.22.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2008-107, s. 10.13(g), effective July 1, 2008.

§ 108A-70.23.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-145, s. 10.41(c), effective July 1, 2011.

History.

1998-1, s. 1; 2003-284, s. 10.29(b); 2008-107, s. 10.13(h); repealed by 2011-145, s. 10.41(c).

§ 108A-70.24.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2008-107, s. 10.13(i), effective July 1, 2008.

§ 108A-70.25.
State Plan for Health Insurance Program for Children.

The NC Health Choice program shall be administered and operated in accordance with this Part and the NC Health Choice State Plan, as periodically amended by the Department of Health and Human Services and approved by the federal government.

The requirements in

G.S. 108A-54.1

A shall apply to NC Health Choice State Plan amendments in the same manner in which they apply to Medicaid State Plan amendments.

History.

1998-1, s. 1; 2011-291, s. 2.23; 2013-360, s. 12H.2(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-291, s. 2.23, effective June 24, 2011, substituted “Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health and Human Services” for “Joint Legislative Health Care Oversight Committee” in the next-to-last sentence.

Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12H.2(b), effective July 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

§ 108A-70.26.
Application process; outreach efforts; appeals.

Application. — The Department shall use an application form for the Program that is concise, relatively easy for the applicant to comprehend and complete, and only as lengthy as necessary for identifying applicants, determining eligibility for the Program or Medicaid, and providing information to applicants on requirements for application submission and proof of eligibility. Application forms shall be obtainable from public health departments and county departments of social services. Applications shall be processed by the county department of social services and may be submitted by mail. The Department may adopt rules for the submission and processing of applications and for securing the proof of eligibility for benefits under this Part.The application form for the Program shall have printed on it or attached to it a notice stating substantially: “The Health Insurance Program for Children is a federally and State funded program that may be discontinued if federal funds are not provided for its continuation.”

Outreach Efforts. —

The Department shall adopt procedures to ensure that the Program is adequately publicized statewide and to comply with federal outreach requirements. The Department shall make information about the Program available through the Internet and shall explore the feasibility of securing a 24-hour toll-free telephone number to facilitate access to Program information. In order to avoid duplication of efforts, in developing outreach procedures the Department shall establish system linkages to ensure the collaboration and coordination of information between and among the Program and such ongoing programs and efforts as:

WIC Program.

Maternal and Child Health Block Grant.

Children’s Special Health Services.

Smart Start.

Head Start.

The Department shall seek private and federal grant funds for outreach activities. The Department shall also seek the participation of the private sector in providing no-cost or low-cost avenues for publicizing the Program in local communities and statewide. The Department may work with the State Health Plan Purchasing Alliance Board to develop programs that utilize the expertise and resources of the Alliances in outreach activities to employees of small businesses.

Appeals. — A person who is dissatisfied with the action of a county department of social services with respect to the determination of eligibility for benefits under the Program may appeal the action in accordance with

G.S. 108A-79

.

History.

1998-1, s. 1.

§ 108A-70.27.
(See editor’s note) Data collection; reporting.

The Department shall ensure that the following data are collected, analyzed, and reported in a manner that will most effectively and expeditiously enable the State to evaluate Program goals, objectives, operations, and health outcomes for children:

Number of applicants for coverage under the Program;

Number of Program applicants deemed eligible for Medicaid;

Number of applicants deemed eligible for the Program, by income level, age, and family size;

Number of applicants deemed ineligible for the Program and the basis for ineligibility;

Number of applications made at county departments of social services, public health departments, and by mail;

Total number of children enrolled in the Program to date and for the immediately preceding fiscal year;

Total number of children enrolled in Medicaid through the Program application process;

Trends showing the Program’s impact on hospital utilization, immunization rates, and other indicators of quality of care, and cost-effectiveness and efficiency;

Trends relating to the health status of children;

Other data that would be useful in carrying out the purposes of this Part.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-360, s. 12A.8(e), effective July 1, 2013.

The Division of Health Benefits shall provide to the Department data required under this section that are collected by this Division. Data shall be reported by the Division of Health Benefits in sufficient detail to meet federal reporting requirements under Title XXI.

History.

1998-1, s. 1; 2011-145, s. 10.41(d); 2011-291, ss. 2.24, 2.25; 2013-360, s. 12A.8(e); 2015-96, s. 5; 2019-81, s. 15(a).

§ 108A-70.28.
Fraudulent misrepresentation.

It shall be unlawful for any person to knowingly and willfully, and with intent to defraud, make or cause to be made a false statement or representation of a material fact in an application for coverage under this Part or intended for use in determining eligibility for coverage.

It shall be unlawful for any applicant, recipient, or person acting on behalf of the applicant or recipient to knowingly and willfully, and with intent to defraud, conceal, or fail to disclose any condition, fact, or event affecting the applicant’s or recipient’s initial or continued eligibility to receive coverage or benefits under this Part.

It is unlawful for any person knowingly, willingly, and with intent to defraud, to obtain or attempt to obtain, or to assist, aid, or abet another person, either directly or indirectly, to obtain money, services, or any other thing of value to which the person is not entitled as a recipient under this Part, or otherwise to deliberately misuse a Program identification card. This misuse includes the sale, alteration, or lending of the Program identification card to others for services and the use of the card by someone other than the recipient to receive or attempt to receive Program coverage for services rendered to that individual.Proof of intent to defraud does not require proof of intent to defraud any particular person.

A person who violates a provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class I felony.

For purposes of this section the word “person” includes any natural person, association, consortium, corporation, body politic, partnership, or other group, entity, or organization.

History.

1998-1, s. 1.

§ 108A-70.29.
Program review process.

Review of Eligibility and Program Enrollment Decisions. — Eligibility and Program enrollment decisions for Program applicants or recipients shall be reviewable pursuant to

G.S. 108A-79

. Program recipients shall remain enrolled in the NC Health Choice Program during the review of a decision to terminate or suspend enrollment. This subsection does not apply to requests for disenrollment from a PHP under Article 1A of Chapter 108D of the General Statutes.

Review of Fee-for-Service Program Health Services Decisions. — This subsection applies only to health services decisions for services being provided to NC Health Choice recipients through the fee-for-service program as defined in

G.S. 108A-24

. This subsection does not apply to adverse benefit determinations as defined in

G.S. 108D-1

. In accordance with 42 C.F.R. § 457.1130 and 42 C.F.R. § 457.1150, a Program recipient may seek review of any delay, denial, reduction, suspension, or termination of health services, in whole or in part, including a determination about the type or level of services, through a two-level review process.

Internal review. — Within 30 days from the date of the decision subject to review under this subsection, a recipient may request a first-level internal review, which shall be conducted by the Clinical Medical Director of the Division of Health Benefits or the Director’s clinical designee.

External review. — If the recipient is dissatisfied with the first-level review decision, then within 15 days after the internal review decision is rendered the recipient may request a second-level independent external review by the Department of Health and Human Services Hearing Office. The external review process shall comply with the provisions of 42 C.F.R. § 457.1140. The Department’s Hearing Office shall assign the matter to a hearing officer who will preside over the review. The hearing may be in person at the Hearing Office in Raleigh or by telephone. Recipients may:

Represent themselves or have representatives of their choosing in the review process.

Review, in a timely manner, their files and other applicable information relevant to the review of the decision.

Fully participate in the review process, including the opportunity to present supplemental information during the review process.

Time frames. — The hearing officer shall render a written decision within 90 calendar days of the date the recipient requested first-level review, as specified at 42 C.F.R. § 457.1160. If the recipient’s physician or health plan determines that operating under the standard 90-day time frame could seriously jeopardize the enrollee’s life or health or ability to attain, maintain, or regain maximum function, then each level of review must be completed within 72 hours, except that this expedited time frame may be extended by up to 14 calendar days if the recipient requests an extension.

Coverage of services during review. — When the decision is a reduction, suspension, termination, or denied request for increase of existing services, notwithstanding the request for review, the services shall be covered in accordance with the decision under review, and services which are terminated or suspended services shall not be covered, unless and until the decision is overturned on review.

Review of decisions pursuant to Programmatic changes. — The Program review process set forth in this section shall not apply to instances in which the sole basis for the decision is a provision in the State plan or in Federal or State law requiring an automatic change in eligibility, enrollment, or a change in coverage under the health benefits package that affects all applicants or enrollees or a group of applicants or enrollees without regard to their individual circumstances.

Notice. — A recipient shall receive timely written notice of any decision subject to review under this section in accordance with the requirements of 42 C.F.R. § 457.1180. The notice shall include the reasons for the decision, an explanation of applicable rights to review of that decision, the standard and expedited time frames for review, the manner in which a review can be requested, and the circumstances under which enrollment may continue pending review.

Rule-Making authority. — The Department shall have the authority to adopt rules for the implementation and operation of the Program review process.

Additional Rule-Making Authority. — The Department of Health and Human Services shall have the authority to adopt rules for the transition and operation of the North Carolina Health Choice Program. Notwithstanding G.S. 150B-21.1(a), the Department of Health and Human Services may adopt temporary rules in accordance with Chapter 150B of the General Statutes for enrolling providers to participate in the NC Health Choice Program, for regulating provider participation in the NC Health Choice Program, and for other operational issues regarding the NC Health Choice Program.

History.

2010-70, s. 1; 2010-96, s. 39(a); 2011-145, s. 10.41(e); 2019-81, ss. 7, 15(a).